Illinois, session 104th, HB4508.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 5/203)  (from Ch. 40, par. 203)7    Sec. 203. License to Marry. 8    (a) When a marriage application has been completed and 9signed by both parties to a prospective marriage and both 10parties have appeared before the county clerk and the marriage 11license fee has been paid, the county clerk shall issue a 12license to marry and a marriage certificate form upon being 13furnished:14        (1) satisfactory proof that each party to the marriage 15    will have attained the age of 18 years at the time the 16    marriage license is effective or will have attained the 17    age of 16 years and has either the consent to the marriage 18    of both parents or his guardian or judicial approval; 19    provided, if one parent cannot be located in order to 20    obtain such consent and diligent efforts have been made to 21    locate that parent by the consenting parent, then the 22    consent of one parent plus a signed affidavit by the 23    consenting parent which (i) names the absent parent and   HB4508 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 17620 JRC 31051 b1    states that he or she cannot be located, and (ii) states 2    what diligent efforts have been made to locate the absent 3    parent, shall have the effect of both parents' consent for 4    purposes of this Section;5        (2) satisfactory proof that the marriage is not 6    prohibited; and7        (3) an affidavit or record as prescribed in 8    subparagraph (1) of Section 205 or a court order as 9    prescribed in subparagraph (2) of Section 205, if 10    applicable.11    With each marriage license, the county clerk shall provide 12a pamphlet describing the causes and effects of fetal alcohol 13syndrome. At least annually, the county board shall submit to 14the Illinois Department of Public Health a report as to the 15county clerk's compliance with the requirement that the county 16clerk provide a pamphlet with each marriage license. All 17funding and production costs for the aforementioned 18educational pamphlets for distribution to each county clerk 19shall be provided by non-profit, non-sectarian statewide 20programs that provide education, advocacy, support, and 21prevention services pertaining to Fetal Alcohol Syndrome. 22    (b) Each county clerk must establish a process within 6 23months or sooner after the effective date of this amendatory 24Act of the 104th General Assembly that allows a party or 25parties to participate in a video conferencing application in 26which a party may be seen and heard by the county clerk in real   HB4508 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 17620 JRC 31051 b1time if a party cannot travel or has difficulty traveling 2because of a disability, physical impairment, or health 3condition that impedes the mobility of a party to appear in 4person. For such a party, at the sole discretion of the county 5clerk, the county clerk or designee may go to a party's 6location to complete the application. A request to the county 7clerk to complete the application in-person at a party's 8location must be supported by a written note or certification 9from a licensed physician, physician assistant, nurse 10practitioner, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, 11certified nursing assistant, or hospice professional stating 12that this accommodation is necessary to prevent a hardship as 13provided in this Section. A party's actions under this Section 14are subject to the provisions of Section 215 of this Act. 15(Source: P.A. 96-1323, eff. 1-1-11.)